Utah statutes.
78A-6-504.   Petition -- Who may file.

(1)  Any interested party, including a foster parent, may file a petition for termination of the parent-child relationship with regard to a child.

(2)  The attorney general shall file a petition for termination of parental rights under this part on behalf of the division.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

